Massachusetts, session 194th, S664.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 2 of chapter 21E of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the definition of “Condition of substantial 
release migration” and inserting in place thereof the following definition:- 
“Condition of substantial release migration”, (a) a release of oil or hazardous material 
that is likely to be transported through environmental media where the mechanism, rate or extent 
of transport has resulted in or, if not promptly addressed, has the potential to result in: (1) health 
damage, safety hazards or environmental harm; or (2) a substantial increase in the extent or 
magnitude of the release, the degree or complexity of future response actions, or the amount of 
response costs.  
(b) Conditions of substantial release migration shall include, but not be limited to:  

of 5 11  (1) releases that have resulted in the discharge of separate-phase oil or separate-phase 
hazardous material to surface waters, buildings or underground utilities or conduits;  
(2) releases to the ground surface or to the vadose zone that, if not promptly removed or 
contained, are likely to significantly impact the underlying groundwater or significantly 
exacerbate an existing condition of groundwater pollution;  
(3) releases to the groundwater that have migrated or are expected to migrate more than 
200 feet per year;  
(4) releases to the groundwater that have been or are within 1 year likely to be detected in 
a public or private water supply well;  
(5) releases to the groundwater that have been or are within 1 year likely to be detected in 
a surface water body, wetland or public water supply reservoir; 
(6) releases to the groundwater or to the vadose zone that have resulted in or have the 
potential to result in the discharge of vapors into a school, daycare or child care center or 
occupied residential dwelling at concentrations greater than indoor air threshold values for the 
evaluation of a vapor intrusion pathway as established by the department; provided, that 
conditions that indicate a potential discharge of vapors into a school, daycare or child care center 
or occupied residential dwelling shall include, but shall not be limited to:  
(i) soil or soil gas impacted with 1 or more volatile organic compounds within 6 feet, 
measured horizontally from the wall of the structure, and within 10 feet measured vertically from 
the basement floor or foundation at concentrations that are likely to discharge vapors into the 
structure;  

of 5 32  (ii) 1 or more volatile organic compound in the groundwater exceed the applicable 
Groundwater Category GW-2 Standard within 30 feet of the structure, and the average annual 
depth to groundwater in that area is 15 feet or less;  
(iii) volatile light non-aqueous phase liquid is present in a groundwater monitoring well, 
excavation, or subsurface depression within 30 feet of the structure at a measured thickness equal 
to or greater than 1/8 inch or .01 feet; or  
(iv) evidence of vapor migration along preferential pathways at a location that is likely to 
result in the discharge of vapors into the structure; or 
(7) any release for which a notification has been required by the department.  
(c) Any person required to notify the department pursuant to section 7 shall notify the 
department of such condition upon obtaining knowledge thereof and shall take any appropriate 
and feasible response actions as may be required by the department. Notwithstanding any general 
or special law to the contrary, the department shall not use any other definition of condition of 
substantial release migration. 
SECTION 2. Said section 2 of said chapter 21E, as so appearing, is hereby further 
amended by inserting, after the definition of “Contain”, the following definition:- 
“Critical exposure pathways”, those routes by which oil or hazardous material released at 
a disposal site are transported, or are likely to be transported, to human receptors via: (i) vapor-
phase emissions of oil or hazardous materials into the living or working space of a pre-school, 
daycare, school or occupied residential dwelling at concentrations greater than indoor air 
threshold values for the evaluation of a vapor intrusion pathway as established by the 

of 5 53 department; or (ii) ingestion, dermal absorption or inhalation of measurable concentrations of oil 
or hazardous materials from drinking water supply wells located at and servicing a pre-school, 
daycare, school or occupied residential dwelling.  
SECTION 3. Section 5C of said chapter 21E, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
adding the following subsection:- 
(l) A department audit of response actions at the site or portion of the site owned or 
operated by an eligible person, as delineated in a waste site cleanup activity opinion, for which a 
permanent solution or remedy operations status exists and is maintained or has been achieved 
and maintained in accordance with such opinion, which (i) identifies no violations of this chapter 
and regulations promulgated thereto, or (ii) if such violations are identified, such violations are 
promptly corrected, shall be deemed conclusive evidence that the eligible person has no liability, 
and the department may take no action as to such eligible person, for any releases at any property 
not previously identified as part of the site or any other disposal site. Notwithstanding any 
general or special law to the contrary, the department shall not promulgate regulations relative to 
this subsection.  
SECTION 4. (a) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, no person 
shall be liable for any substantial release migration at any property not previously identified as 
part of a disposal site or any other disposal site if the department of environmental protection: 
(i) has, at any time before the effective date of this act, performed an audit of response 
actions at a site, or a part of a site; and  
(ii)(1) has determined that a permanent solution or remedy operations status was achieved 
and maintained in accordance with a waste site cleanup activity opinion or any other notification 

of 5 75 to such person; or (2) has notified such person that a violation of chapter 21E of the General 
Laws or any regulation was identified and promptly corrected. 
(b) The department of environmental protection shall have no defense in any action or 
claim, nor shall the department present evidence to contest liability of an eligible person, upon a 
showing that a permanent solution or remedy operations status was achieved and maintained.